Massachusetts, session 194th, S1789.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32 Sec 3(g) as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by
adding after the word Authority in line 270, the following new words "; Brockton School
Police."
of 1